Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 5, chapter 68, Oregon Laws 2016, is amended to read:
Sec. 5.  (1) As used in this section,  “trauma-informed approach” means an approach that recog-
nizes the signs and symptoms of trauma in students, families and staff and responds by fully  inte-
grating knowledge about trauma into policies, procedures and practices for the  purposes of resisting
the reoccurrence of trauma and promoting resiliency.
(2) The Chief Education Office, in coordination with the Oregon Health Authority and  the De-
partment of Education, shall distribute moneys as provided  in this section to school districts and
education service districts for the purpose of decreasing rates of school absenteeism.
(3)(a) A school district or an education service district may apply to receive moneys under this
section:
(A) By submitting an application that includes a  proposal consistent with subsection (4) of this
section;  and
(B) If the district has at least one school in the district with:
(i) A school-based health center; or
(ii) A school-based system for providing behavioral health services and care coordination that
may include a school nurse, a school counselor, a school psychologist , [ or] a clinical psychologist
or a school social worker .
(b) A school district or an education  service district may submit an application jointly with one
or more community  partners that will participate with the district in the pilot program described
in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) The office shall distribute moneys to an applicant  based on the applicant’s proposal to design
and implement a pilot program to  decrease rates of school absenteeism by using trauma-informed
approaches to education, health  services and intervention strategies that are based in schools and
take advantage of community resources. The proposal must include a plan that:
(a) Coordinates the services provided by:
(A) The school;
(B) The school-based health center or the administrator of the school-based system  described in
subsection (3)(a)(B)(ii) of this section; and
(C) Coordinated care organizations,  public health entities, nonprofit youth service providers,
community-based organizations, social  justice groups and similar groups that are located in the
community;
Enrolled House Bill 2648 (HB 2648-INTRO) Page 1
(b) Requires professional development and support  for school staff, including educators, school
district  or  education service district professionals, counselors, nurses, classified staff and other staff
of the school district or education service district, to create a culture in the district and  community
that is informed about how to understand, recognize and respond to trauma;
(c) Provides for at least one trauma specialist who:
(A) Is permanently assigned at the school-based health center or at the location  where the
school-based system described in subsection (3)(a)(B)(ii) of this section is provided; and
(B) Oversees the implementation  of the plan, including coordinating the services described in
paragraph (a) of this subsection and coordinating the  professional development and support de-
scribed in paragraph (b) of this subsection;
(d) Indicates how services coordinated under paragraph  (a) of this subsection are provided based
on a trauma-informed approach and with an understanding, recognition  and responsiveness to the
effects of trauma on education, absenteeism and school completion;
(e) Uses evidence-based and evidence-informed approaches, culturally specific approaches  when
appropriate and national models that are tailored to the community to ensure that data are collected
and the effectiveness of the pilot program is determined;
(f) Provides matching community funding, or resources that  are the monetary equivalent of
matching funding, in a ratio determined by the office by rule; and
(g) Pursues additional funding opportunities,  including funding under the federal Every Student
Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95).
(5) The office shall prescribe the timelines by which  an applicant may submit an application for
moneys under this section and the form of the application.
(6) The office shall  evaluate and rank applications based on the proposals submitted in the ap-
plications.
(7) The office shall distribute moneys to applicants based on:
(a) The evaluations and rankings described in subsection (6) of this section;
(b) The moneys appropriated to the office for the purpose of this section;
(c) The amount of matching community funding available to the applicant; and
(d) Any available federal grants.
(8)(a) The office, in  collaboration with the Oregon Health Authority and the Department of Ed-
ucation, shall provide coordination among school  districts and education service districts receiving
moneys under this section.
(b) The office  may coordinate with a statewide nonprofit organization that has experience in
supporting school-based health centers and  student health organizations for the organization to
provide technical assistance to school districts and education  service districts receiving moneys
under this section.
(9) Each participating school district and education  service district shall provide regular reports
on the progress of the district’s pilot program to the office to enable the office to:
(a) Determine the effectiveness of the pilot program; and
(b) Submit a report and recommendations for legislation to the  interim committees of the Leg-
islative Assembly related to education as required under subsection (10) of this section.
(10) No later than October 15, 2019, the Chief Education Office, the Oregon  Health Authority
and the Department of Education, in collaboration with the statewide nonprofit organization  de-
scribed in subsection (8) of this section, shall  submit a report to the interim committees of the
Legislative Assembly related to education. The report  must provide individual and comprehensive
evaluations  on  the outcomes of the pilot programs and include any recommendations for legislation
based on the results of the pilot programs.
SECTION 2.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 2648 (HB 2648-INTRO) Page 2
Passed by House March 6, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 15, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2648 (HB 2648-INTRO) Page 3